Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-282
Juvenile court; transfer case and records to court of domicile.

If a petition alleging a juvenile to be within the jurisdiction of the Nebraska Juvenile Code is filed in a county other than the county where the juvenile is presently living or domiciled, the court, at any time after adjudication and prior to final termination of jurisdiction, may transfer the proceedings to the county where the juvenile lives or is domiciled and the court having juvenile court jurisdiction therein shall thereafter have sole charge of such proceedings and full authority to enter any order it could have entered had the adjudication occurred therein.

All documents, social histories, and records, or certified copies thereof, on file with the court pertaining to the case shall accompany the transfer.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 38;

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 24.

Because venue is immaterial in juvenile proceedings, a court should not grant a motion to dismiss based on an allegation of improper venue. Pursuant to the statutory language, a juvenile court should first hold an adjudication hearing, and after the adjudication hearing, it should determine whether it would be proper to transfer the proceedings to a court in the county where the juvenile resides. In re Interest of Breana M., 18 Neb. App. 910, 795 N.W.2d 660 (2011).

This section allows an adjudication proceeding to be filed in any county and allows for discretionary transfer, after adjudication, to the county where the juvenile is living or domiciled. In re Interest of Tegan V., 18 Neb. App. 857, 794 N.W.2d 190 (2011).

This section makes venue immaterial in addition to setting up a procedure for discretionary transfer. In re Interest of Tegan V., 18 Neb. App. 857, 794 N.W.2d 190 (2011).